Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1428HV (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 261 Section 1. REPEAL. Section 97B.53A, Code 2025, is repealed. 1 EXPLANATION 2 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 3 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 4 This bill repeals the Iowa public employeesâ retirement 5 systemâs obligation to, upon a memberâs termination of covered 6 employment prior to the memberâs retirement, send to the 7 memberâs last known address a notice that contains the balance 8 and status of the memberâs accounts and explains the memberâs 9 possible courses of action under Code chapter 97B. 10 -1- LSB 1428HV (1) 91 sc/ns 1/ 1